Utah statutes.
63G-6-801.5 (Repealed 05/01/13).   Requirement to exhaust administrative remedies -- Protests and appeals.

(1)  A person may not challenge a procurement, a procurement process, the award of a contract relating to a procurement, a debarment, or a suspension, in a court, before an administrative officer or body, or in any other forum other than the forum permitted in this chapter.

(2)  A person who desires to challenge a procurement, a procurement process, the award of a contract relating to a procurement, a debarment, or a suspension, shall bring the challenge, in accordance with the requirements of this chapter, by timely filing:

(a)  a protest in accordance with Section 63G-6-801;

(b)  any appeal of the protest decision in accordance with Section 63G-6-807; and

(c)  any appeal from a procurement appeals panel in accordance with Section 63G-6-815.

(3)  A person who files a protest or appeal under this chapter is limited to protesting or appealing on the grounds specified in the filing document described in Subsection 63G-6-801(3)(b).

(4)  In hearing a protest or an appeal under this chapter relating to an expenditure of federal assistance, federal contract funds, or a federal grant, the person who hears the appeal shall ensure compliance with federal law and regulations relating to the expenditure.



Enacted by Chapter 91, 2012 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 347, 2012 General Session, (Coordination Clause)

